Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.100

Employee teamwork incentive program—Applications.

(1) With the exception of agencies of the legislative and judicial branches, any organizational unit composed of employees in any agency or group of agencies of state government with the ability to identify costs, revenues, or both may apply to the board to participate in the teamwork incentive program as a team. The application shall have the approval of the heads of the agency or agencies within which the team is located.

(2) Applications shall be in the form specified by the board and contain such information as the board requires. This may include, but is not limited to, quantitative measures which establish a database of program output or performance expectations, or both. This database is used to evaluate savings in accordance with RCW 41.60.110.

[ 1999 c 50 s 7; 1993 c 467 s 4; 1989 c 56 s 2; 1987 c 387 s 5; 1985 c 114 s 4; 1982 c 167 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 467: See note following RCW 41.60.010.

Effective date—1989 c 56: See note following RCW 41.60.041.

Effective date—1985 c 114: See note following RCW 41.60.015.

Severability—1982 c 167: See note following RCW 41.60.015.